North Carolina, session 2025, SB51.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. IMPLEMENT GROUP CAPITAL CALCULATION AND LIQUIDITY STRESS
TEST REQUIREMENTS FOR INSURANCE HOLDING COMPANY SYSTEMS
SECTION 1. Article 19 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
the following new sections to read:
"§ 58-19-26. Group capital calculation.
(a) Reporting Requirement. – The ultimate controlling person of every insurer subject to
registration pursuant to G.S. 58-19-25 shall concurrently file with the registration an annual
group capital calculation report. The report shall be filed with the lead state commissioner.
(b) Exemptions. – The ultimate controlling person of any of the following is exempt from
the filing requirement of subsection (a) of this section:
(1) An insurance holding company system that (i) has only one insurer within its
holding company structure, (ii) only writes insurance business, (iii) is only
licensed in its state of domicile, and (iv) assumes no business from any other
insurer.
(2) An insurance holding company system that is required to perform a group
capital calculation specified by the United States Federal Reserve Board.
When this exemption applies, the lead state commissioner shall request the
calculation from the United States Federal Reserve Board. If the United States
Federal Reserve Board cannot share the calculation with the lead state
commissioner under the terms of any information sharing agreements in
effect, then the insurance holding company system is not exempt from the
group capital calculation filing.
(3) An insurance holding company system whose non-United States group-wide
supervisor is located within a reciprocal jurisdiction that recognizes the United
States state regulatory approach to group supervision and group capital.
(4) An insurance holding company system that meets both of the following
requirements:
*S51-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. The insurance holding company system provides information to the
lead state commissioner that meets the requirements for accreditation
under the NAIC financial standards and accreditation program. The
insurance holding company may provide this information either
directly or indirectly through its group-wide supervisor. If provided
indirectly through a group-wide supervisor, the supervisor is
responsible for determining whether the information provided is
sufficient to permit the lead state commissioner to comply with the
NAIC group supervision approach, as detailed in the NAIC Financial
Analysis Handbook.
b. The insurance holding company system's non-United States
group-wide supervisor is not in a reciprocal jurisdiction but
nonetheless recognizes the group capital calculation as the worldwide
group capital assessment for United States insurance groups who
operate in that jurisdiction.
(c) Recognition of Group Capital Calculation. – For purposes of subdivision (b)(4) of
this section, a non-United States jurisdiction recognizes the group capital calculation if it satisfies
any of the following criteria:
(1) A competent regulatory authority in the jurisdiction affirms that insurers and
insurance groups whose lead state is accredited by the NAIC under the NAIC
accreditation program shall be subject only to worldwide prudential insurance
group supervision, including worldwide group governance, solvency and
capital, and reporting, as applicable, by that jurisdiction's lead state
commissioner and will not be subject to group supervision, including
worldwide group governance, solvency and capital, and reporting, at the level
of the worldwide parent undertaking of the insurance or reinsurance group by
the non-United States jurisdiction.
(2) A competent regulatory authority in the jurisdiction affirms that information
regarding insurers and their parent, subsidiary, or affiliated entities, if
applicable, shall be provided to the lead state commissioner in accordance
with an information sharing agreement in the form of a memorandum of
understanding or similar document. Acceptable information sharing
agreements include the International Association of Insurance Supervisors
Multilateral Memorandum of Understanding or other multilateral memoranda
of understanding coordinated by the NAIC. The jurisdiction does not satisfy
this criteria if the lead state commissioner determines, in consultation with the
NAIC, that the requirements of the information sharing agreements are no
longer in force.
(3) If no United States insurance groups operate in the non-United States
jurisdiction, that non-United States jurisdiction notifies the lead state
commissioner and the International Association of Insurance Supervisors in
writing that the jurisdiction considers the group capital calculation an
acceptable international capital standard.
(d) Limitation of Exemptions. – Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the lead
state commissioner shall require filing of the group capital calculation for United States
operations of any non-United States based insurance holding company system if the lead state
commissioner determines that the filing is required for (i) prudential oversight and solvency
monitoring purposes or (ii) ensuring the competitiveness of the insurance marketplace.
(e) Consideration and Correction of NAIC Materials. – The lead state commissioner shall
consider any relevant lists, reports, and recommendations published by the NAIC in determining
whether the exceptions of subdivision (b)(4) of this section apply to an insurer. If the lead state
Page 2 Senate Bill 51-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
commissioner's determination differs from relevant materials published by the NAIC, the lead
state commissioner shall provide the NAIC with written justification for the difference supported
by documentation. If published NAIC materials indicate that a non-United States jurisdiction
recognizes the group capital calculation and the lead state commissioner determines that the
jurisdiction no longer meets the requirements of subsection (c) of this section, the lead state
commissioner may recommend a correction of the materials to the NAIC.
(f) Discretionary Exemptions. – The lead state commissioner may either (i) exempt the
ultimate controlling person of an insurance holding company system from the filing requirement
of subsection (a) of this section or (ii) authorize the ultimate controlling person of an insurance
holding company to file a limited group capital filing in lieu of the filing requirement of
subsection (a) of this section if all of the following apply:
(1) The insurance holding company system has annual direct written and
unaffiliated assumed premium, including international direct and assumed
premium, but excluding premiums reinsured with the Federal Crop Insurance
Corporation and Federal Flood Program, of less than one billion dollars
($1,000,000,000).
(2) The insurance holding company system does not include insurers within its
holding company structure that are domiciled outside of the United States or
one of its territories.
(3) The insurance holding company system does not include banking, depository,
or other financial entity that is subject to an identified regulatory capital
framework within its holding company structure.
(4) The insurance holding company system attests that there are no material
changes in transactions between insurers and non-insurers in the group that
have occurred since the last filing of an annual group calculation report, if any.
(5) The non-insurers within the insurance holding company system do not pose a
material financial risk to the insurer's ability to honor policyholder
obligations.
(g) Resumption of Filings. – If the lead state commissioner determines that an insurance
holding company system exempted from the filing requirements of subsection (a) of this section
no longer meets the requirements for an exemption, the insurance holding company system shall
file the group capital calculation at the next annual filing date unless given an extension by the
lead state commissioner based on reasonable grounds shown. If the lead state commissioner,
pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, either grants a discretionary exemption or authorizes a
limited group capital filing, the lead state commissioner may require the ultimate controlling
person of that insurance holding company system to file an annual group calculation at any time
if all of the following apply:
(1) Any insurer within the insurance holding company system is in a risk-based
capital action level event as set forth in Article 12 of this Chapter or a similar
standard for a non-United States insurer.
(2) Any insurer within the insurance holding company system meets one or more
of the standards of an insurer deemed to be in hazardous financial condition
pursuant to the criteria provided in G.S. 58-30-60.
(3) Any insurer within the insurance holding company system otherwise exhibits
qualities of a troubled insurer as determined by the lead state commissioner
based on unique circumstances, including the type and volume of business
written, ownership and organizational structure, federal agency requests, and
international supervisor requests.
"§ 58-19-27. Liquidity stress test.
(a) Participation and Reporting Requirement. – The ultimate controlling person of every
insurer subject to registration pursuant to G.S. 58-19-25 shall be included in the NAIC liquidity
Senate Bill 51-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
stress test framework and file a report with the lead state commissioner detailing the results of a
specific year's liquidity stress test if either of the following applies:
(1) The insurer meets the scope criteria of that data year's NAIC liquidity stress
test framework.
(2) The insurer did not meet the scope criteria of that data year's liquidity stress
test framework, but the lead state commissioner, in consultation with the
NAIC Financial Stability Task Force or its successor, nonetheless determines
the insurer should be included in the NAIC liquidity stress test framework for
that data year. In making this determination, the lead state commissioner shall
attempt to avoid the frequent inclusion or exclusion of insurers.
(b) The performance of, and filing of the results from, a specific year's liquidity stress
test shall comply with (i) the NAIC liquidity stress test framework's instructions and reporting
templates for that year and (ii) all lead state commissioners' directives issued in consultation with
the NAIC Financial Stability Task Force or its successor.
(c) Exemptions. – The lead state commissioner may, in consultation with the NAIC
Financial Stability Task Force or its successor, exempt an ultimate controlling person from the
reporting requirements of subsection (a) of this section. The lead state commissioner shall
consider the intent of regulators to avoid having insurers scoped in and out of the NAIC liquidity
stress test framework on a frequent basis when making this determination.
"§ 58-19-28. Dissemination prohibited.
(a) Unless otherwise provided by law, the making, publishing, disseminating, circulating,
or placing before the public, or causing directly or indirectly to be made, published, disseminated,
circulated, or placed before the public in a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or in the
form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, or over any radio or television station or
any electronic means of communication available to the public, or in any other way as an
advertisement, announcement, or statement containing a representation or statement with regard
to the group capital calculation, group capital ratio, the liquidity stress test results, or supporting
disclosures for the liquidity stress test of any insurer or any insurer group, or of any component
derived in the calculation by any insurer, broker, or other person engaged in any manner in the
insurance business is prohibited.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, if any materially false statement with
respect to the group capital calculation, resulting group capital ratio, an inappropriate comparison
of any amount to an insurer's or insurance group's group capital calculation or resulting group
capital ratio, liquidity stress test result, supporting disclosures for the liquidity stress test, or an
inappropriate comparison of any amount to an insurer's or insurance group's liquidity stress test
result, or supporting disclosures is published in any written publication and the insurer is able to
demonstrate to the Commissioner with substantial proof the falsity or inappropriateness of the
statement, then the insurer may publish announcements in a written publication if the sole
purpose of the announcement is to rebut the materially false or inappropriate statement."

PART II. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 58-19-5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-19-5. Definitions.
As used in this Article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms have the
following meanings:
…
(10a) Group capital calculation. – A report, completed in accordance with the group
capital calculation instructions as adopted and amended by the NAIC, used to
evaluate the capital adequacy of insurance holding company systems that
includes information on the sources of capital within the system, where that
capital is located, and sources of risk.
Page 4 Senate Bill 51-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(10a)(10b) Group-wide supervisor. – The regulatory official authorized to engage in
conducting and coordinating group-wide supervision activities who is
determined or acknowledged by the Commissioner under G.S. 58-19-38 to
have sufficient significant contacts with the internationally active insurance
group.
…
(12b) Lead state commissioner. – The person responsible for regulating the
insurance holding company system as determined by the Commissioner in
accordance with the procedures within the Financial Analysis Handbook
adopted by the NAIC.
(12c) Limited group capital filing. – A simplified version of the group capital
calculation, completed in accordance with procedures adopted by the NAIC,
where an insurance holding company system only provides a limited amount
of data, allowing them to avoid the filing of a full group capital calculation.
(12d) Liquidity stress test. – A process simulating extreme market conditions to
assess an entity's ability to maintain sufficient liquidity in response to adverse
events.
(12e) NAIC. – The National Association of Insurance Commissioners.
(12f) NAIC liquidity stress test framework. – A publication, adopted and amended
by the NAIC in accordance with procedures adopted by the NAIC, which
includes a history of the NAIC's development of regulatory liquidity stress
testing, the scope criteria applicable for a specific data year, and the liquidity
stress test instructions and reporting templates for a specific data year.
…
(13a) Reciprocal jurisdiction. – As defined in G.S. 58-7-21(b)(4b).
(13b) Scope criteria. – Designated exposure bases, detailed in the NAIC liquidity
stress test framework along with minimum magnitudes thereof for the
specified data year, used to establish a preliminary list of insurers included in
the NAIC liquidity stress test framework for that data year.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 58-19-15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-19-15. Acquisition of control of or merger with domestic insurer.
…
(b) The statement to be filed with the Commissioner under subsection (a) of this section
shall be furnished on a Form A as prescribed by the Commissioner, made under oath or
affirmation, and shall contain the following information:
…
(11a) An agreement by the person required to file the statement referred to in
subsection (a) of this section that it will provide the annual report, as specified
in G.S. 58-19-25, G.S. 58-19-25(l), for so long as control exists.
…."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 58-19-25 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-19-25. Registration of insurers.insurers; disclaimer of affiliation; enterprise risk
filings.
…
(c) No information need be disclosed on the registration statement filed pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section if such information is not material for the purposes of this section.
Unless the Commissioner by rule or order provides otherwise, all material. For purposes of this
section, all sales, purchases, exchanges, loans or extensions of credit, investments, or guarantees
involving one-half of one percent ( 1//s2%) (0.5%) or less of an insurer's admitted assets as of
the preceding December 31 are not material for the purposes of this section.material, unless the
Senate Bill 51-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Commissioner by rule or order provides otherwise. This subsection does not apply to the
reporting requirements of G.S. 58-19-26 and G.S. 58-19-27.
…
(l) Effective January 1, 2016, the ultimate controlling person of every insurer subject to
registration shall also file an annual enterprise risk report on Form F as prescribed by the
Commissioner. The report shall, to the best of the ultimate controlling person's knowledge and
belief, identify the material risks within the insurance holding company system that could pose
enterprise risk to the insurer. The report shall be filed with the lead state commissioner of the
insurance holding company system as determined by the procedures within the Financial
Analysis Handbook adopted by the NAIC.commissioner."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 58-19-40 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-19-40. Confidential treatment.
(a) Documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the
Department that are obtained by or disclosed to the Commissioner or any other person in the
course of an examination or investigation made pursuant to G.S. 58-19-35, and all information
reported or provided to the Department pursuant to subdivisions (11a) and (11b) of
G.S. 58-19-15(b), G.S. 58-19-25, G.S. 58-19-30 and G.S. 58-19-38 are recognized by this State
as being proprietary and to contain trade secrets, and shall be confidential by law and privileged,
shall not be considered a public record under either G.S. 58-2-100 or Chapter 132 of the General
Statutes, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in
evidence in any private civil action. However, the Commissioner is authorized to use the
documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action
brought as a part of the Commissioner's official duties. The Commissioner shall not otherwise
make the documents, materials, or other information public without the prior written consent of
the insurer to which it pertains unless the Commissioner, after giving the insurer and its affiliates
who would be affected thereby notice and opportunity to be heard, determines that the interest of
policyholders, shareholders, or the public will be served by the publication thereof, in which
event the Commissioner may publish all or any part of the information in such manner as may
be deemed appropriate.
(a1) With respect to information provided to the Department pursuant to G.S. 58-19-26
and G.S. 58-19-27, the Commissioner shall:
(1) Maintain the confidentiality of the group capital calculation and group capital
ratio produced within the calculation and any group capital information
received from an insurance holding company system supervised by the
Federal Reserve Board or any United States group-wide supervisor.
(2) Maintain the confidentiality of the liquidity stress test results and supporting
disclosures and any liquidity stress test information received from an
insurance holding company system supervised by the Federal Reserve Board
and non-United States group-wide supervisors.
…
(c) In order to assist in the performance of the duties imposed by this Article, the
Commissioner:
(1) May share documents, materials, or other information, including the
confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information subject to
subsection (a) of this section, including proprietary and trade secret documents
and materials, with other all of the following:
a. Other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies, with the
NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and with state, agencies.
b. The NAIC.
c. Any third-party consultants designated by the Commissioner.
Page 6 Senate Bill 51-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. State, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, including
members of any supervisory college described in G.S. 58-19-37,
provided that the recipient agrees in writing to maintain the
confidentiality and privileged status of the document, material, or
other information and has verified in writing the legal authority to
maintain confidentiality.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, may only share
confidential and privileged documents, material, or information reported
pursuant to G.S. 58-19-25 G.S. 58-19-25(l) with Commissioners of states
having statutes or regulations substantially similar to subsection (a) of this
section and who have agreed in writing not to disclose such information.
(3) May receive documents, materials, or information, including otherwise
confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information information,
including proprietary and trade-secret information, from the NAIC and its
affiliates and subsidiaries and from regulatory and law enforcement officials
of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, and shall maintain as confidential
or privileged any document, material, or information received with notice or
the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the
jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or information.
(4) Shall enter into written agreements with the NAIC and any third-party
consultant designated by the Commissioner governing sharing and use of
information provided pursuant to this Article consistent with this subsection
that shall:shall do all of the following:
a. Require a recipient to maintain the confidentiality and privileged
status of any documents, materials, or information. Specify procedures
and protocols regarding the confidentiality and security of information
shared with the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries or a third-party
consultant designated by the Commissioner pursuant to this Article,
including procedures and protocols for sharing by the NAIC with other
state, federal, or international regulators;regulators. The agreement
shall require a recipient to verify in writing that the recipient has
reviewed the legal authority supporting any confidentiality or
privilege.
b. Specify that ownership of information shared with the NAIC and its
affiliates and subsidiaries or a third-party consultant pursuant to this
Article remains with the Commissioner, and the NAIC's use of the
information by the NAIC or third-party consultant designated by the
Commissioner is subject to the direction of the
Commissioner;Commissioner.
c. Prohibit the NAIC or third-party consultant designated by the
Commissioner from storing the information shared pursuant to this
section in a permanent database after the underlying analysis is
completed. This sub-subdivision does not apply to documents,
material, or information reported pursuant to G.S. 58-19-27.
c.d. Require prompt notice to be given to an insurer whose confidential
information in the possession of the NAIC or a third-party consultant
designated by the Commissioner pursuant to this Article is subject to
a request or subpoena to the NAIC for disclosure or production;
andproduction.
d.e. Require the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries or a third-party
consultant designated by the Commissioner to consent to intervention
Senate Bill 51-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
by an insurer in any judicial or administrative action in which the
NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries or a third-party consultant
designated by the Commissioner may be required to disclose
confidential information about the insurer shared with the NAIC and
its affiliates and subsidiaries or a third-party consultant designated by
the Commissioner pursuant to Article 19 of this Chapter.
f. Require the Commissioner to notify an insurer when documents,
materials, or information confidential or privileged to that insurer are
shared with a third-party consultant. The notification shall include the
identity of the third-party consultant. This sub-subdivision only
applies to documents, materials, or information shared pursuant to
G.S. 58-19-27.
…
(f) Documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the NAIC
or a third-party consultant designated by the Commissioner pursuant to a requirement of this
Article shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be considered a public record under
G.S. 58-2-100 or Chapter 132 of the General Statutes, shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall
not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action."

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026.
Page 8 Senate Bill 51-First Edition